Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 6

Medical Experiments

41-21-601. Participation in medical experiments strictly voluntary.

The participation by inmates of state, county or city penal and reformatory institutions in any testing projects or other medical experiments shall be strictly voluntary.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-2201.

41-21-602. Written explanation of experiment required.

Any pharmaceutical company or other person, firm, corporation, foundation or other association of persons using inmates to test experimental drugs or to conduct any other medical experiments must deliver to those inmates a written statement explaining the following:

The nature and purpose of any drug being tested or any experiment being performed;

Why the drug is being tested or other experiment performed;

Current research on the drug being tested or on the subject matter of the experiment;

Procedures and restrictions the inmates must observe during the testing; and

All known side effects of any drug being tested.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-2202.

41-21-603. Compensation.

Payment for services of the inmates shall be commensurate with payments for the same services to non-inmates, taking into consideration the special conditions of inmates.

No person other than a participating inmate or any certified medical personnel and pharmaceutical company employees directly involved in any drug testing or other medical experiment shall receive payment for services in connection with the testing or other experiment.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, §§ 3,4; T.C.A., § 41-2203.

41-21-604. Agreements on contractual basis.

Agreements shall be on a contractual basis. All participants shall be paid the entire amount specified in the contract, even if the participant is not able to complete the experiment because of the adverse effect of the drug or other treatment.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, § 5; T.C.A., § 41-2204.

41-21-605. Results of experiment.

A copy of the results of the test or other experiment shall be sent to each inmate and prison administrator involved.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-2205.

41-21-606. Participation of minors prohibited.

No minor serving a sentence in a penal or reformatory institution or committed to a juvenile institution shall participate in testing projects or other medical experiments.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, § 7; T.C.A., § 41-2206.

41-21-607. Penalties.

A violation of this part is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1974, ch. 770, § 8; T.C.A., § 41-2207; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.